src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN-OBL    
 +Sg+Gen:#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:#lågenan%> K ;           
 +Cmp/SgGen:#lågenan%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Acc:v#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:s#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Com:jn#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Par:t#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Nom:#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Gen:j#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Acc:jt#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Ill:jda#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Ine:jn#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Ela:js#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Com:j#lågenan%> K ; 
 
LEXICON ÅVTÅLÅGENAN
 +Sg+Gen:%>#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>#lågenan%> K ;                         
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>#lågenan%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>v#lågenan%> K ;             
 +Sg+Ine:%>n#lågenan%> K ;             
 +Sg+Ela:%>s#lågenan%> K ;             
 +Sg+Com:%>jn#lågenan%> K ;            
 +Sg+Par:%>t#lågenan%> K ;             
 +Pl+Nom:%>#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Gen:%>j#lågenan%> K ;             
 +Pl+Acc:%>jt#lågenan%> K ;            
 +Pl+Ill:%>jda#lågenan%> K ;           
 +Pl+Ine:%>jn#lågenan%> K ;            
 +Pl+Ela:%>js#lågenan%> K ;            
 +Pl+Com:%>j#lågenan%> K ;             

LEXICON GUOKTALÅGENAN
 GUOVTELÅGENAN ;               
 GUOKT-LÅGENAN ;                 

LEXICON GUOVTELÅGENAN     
 +Sg+Acc:e%>Q1v#lågenan%> K ;                           
 +Sg+Gen:e%>Q1#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>Q1#lågenan%> K ;                               
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>Q1#lågenan%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>Q1n#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Sg+Ela:e%>Q1s#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Sg+Com:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Sg+Par:e%>Q1t#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Nom:e%>Q1#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Pl+Gen:i%>Q1j#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Acc:i%>Q1jt#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Ill:i%>Q1jda#lågenan%> K ;             
 +Pl+Ine:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Ela:i%>Q1js#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Com:i%>Q1j#lågenan%> K ;               
                                      
LEXICON GUOKT-LÅGENAN                 
 +Sg+Nom:a%>#lågenan%> K ;    
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:e%>#lågenan%> K ;                            
 +Sg+Acc:a%>#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Ess:a%>n#lågenan%> K ;       
 +Ess:e%>n#lågenan%> K ;                             

LEXICON GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN                 
 :%> GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-NAIE ;            
 :%>Q1 GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-OBL ;           

LEXICON GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-NAIE            
 +Sg+Nom:#lågenan%> K ;                 
 +Sg+Acc:#lågenan%> K ;                 
 +Sg+Ill:j#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Ess:n#lågenan%> K ;                   
                                      
LEXICON GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-OBL  
 +Sg+Acc:v#lågenan%> K ;                           
 +Sg+Gen:#lågenan%> K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:#lågenan%> K ;                                  
 +Cmp/SgGen:#lågenan%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Ine:n#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Sg+Ela:s#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Sg+Com:jn#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Sg+Par:t#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Pl+Nom:#lågenan%> K ;                 
 +Pl+Gen:j#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Pl+Acc:jt#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Ill:jda#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Ine:jn#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Ela:js#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Com:j#lågenan%> K ;                

LEXICON GIETJAVLÅGENAN
 :%> GIETJAVLÅGENAN-IE ;             
 :%>Q1 GIETJAVLÅGENAN-OBL ;          

LEXICON GIETJAVLÅGENAN-IE  
 +Sg+Ill:j#lågenan%> K ;           
 +Ess:n#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Nom:#lågenan%> K ;                
                  
                                      
LEXICON GIETJAVLÅGENAN-OBL            
 +Sg+Nom:v#lågenan%> K ;   
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:#lågenan%> K ;                             
 +Sg+Gen:#lågenan%> K ;  
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:#lågenan%> K ;                                
 +Cmp/SgGen:#lågenan%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Acc:v#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Sg+Ine:n#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Sg+Ela:s#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Sg+Com:jn#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Sg+Par:t#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Pl+Nom:#lågenan%> K ;                 
 +Pl+Gen:j#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Pl+Acc:jt#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Ill:jda#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Ine:jn#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Ela:js#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Com:j#lågenan%> K ;                

LEXICON GÁKTSALÅGENAN
 GÁVTSELÅGENAN ;               
 GÁKTS-LÅGENAN ;                 

LEXICON GÁVTSELÅGENAN    
 +Sg+Acc:e%>Q1v#lågenan%> K ;                            
 +Sg+Gen:e%>Q1#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>Q1#lågenan%> K ;                               
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>Q1#lågenan%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>Q1n#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Sg+Ela:e%>Q1s#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Sg+Com:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Sg+Par:e%>Q1t#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Nom:e%>Q1#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Pl+Gen:i%>Q1j#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Acc:i%>Q1jt#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Ill:i%>Q1jda#lågenan%> K ;             
 +Pl+Ine:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Ela:i%>Q1js#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Com:i%>Q1j#lågenan%> K ;               
                                      
LEXICON GÁKTS-LÅGENAN                 
 +Sg+Nom:a%>#lågenan%> K ;           
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:e%>#lågenan%> K ;                     
 +Sg+Acc:a%>#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Sg+Ill:á%>j#lågenan%> K ;
 +Ess:a%>n#lågenan%> K ;       
 +Ess:e%>n#lågenan%> K ;                  

LEXICON AKTSELÅGENAN
 AVTSELÅGENAN ;                
 AKTS-LÅGENAN ;                  

LEXICON AVTSELÅGENAN 
 +Sg+Acc:e%>Q1v#lågenan%> K ;                                
 +Sg+Gen:e%>Q1#lågenan%> K ;  
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>Q1#lågenan%> K ;                              
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>Q1#lågenan%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>Q1n#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Sg+Ela:e%>Q1s#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Sg+Com:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Sg+Par:e%>Q1t#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Nom:e%>Q1#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Pl+Gen:i%>Q1j#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Acc:i%>Q1jt#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Ill:i%>Q1jda#lågenan%> K ;             
 +Pl+Ine:i%>Q1jn#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Ela:i%>Q1js#lågenan%> K ;              
 +Pl+Com:i%>Q1j#lågenan%> K ;               
                                      
LEXICON AKTS-LÅGENAN                  
 +Sg+Nom:e%>#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Sg+Acc:e%>#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Sg+Ill:á%>j#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Ess:e%>n#lågenan%> K ;                  

! Tjuhte and tuvsán              
                                    
LEXICON TJUOHTECASE !incoming from TJUOHTE           
              :e%>Q1 TJUODE- ; !tjuohte-                   
              :i%>Q1 TJUODI- ; !tjuohti-               
 +Der/akti+Adv:ti%>  K       ;
!       TJUOHT- ;                       
                                      
LEXICON TJUODE-                       
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;                       
 +Sg+Gen: K ; 
 +Cmp/SgGen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;  
 +Sg+Ill+Attr: K ;                                             
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;                       
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;                       
 +Sg+Par:t K ;                       
 +Pl+Nom: K ;                        

LEXICON TJUODI-                      
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;                       
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;                      
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;                      
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;                     
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;                      
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;                      
 +Pl+Com:j K ;                       
                                      
!LEXICON TJUOHT-                       
! +Sg+Nom:%>e K ;                        
! +Ess:e%>n K ;                          
! +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;                       

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-TJUOHTECASE
 +Use/NG:e%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-TJUODE- ;                     

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-TJUODE-                       
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;                       
 +Sg+Gen: K ;                        
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;                       
