src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON LÅGENAN
lågenanakta+v2+Num+Use/-Spell:åvtå ÅVTÅLÅGENAN ;   !old
lågenanguokta+v2+Num+Use/-Spell:guokt GUOKTALÅGENAN ; !old
lågenangålmmå+v2+Num+Use/-Spell:gålmmå GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN ; !old
lågenanniellja+v2+Num+Use/-Spell:niellj GUOKTALÅGENAN ; !old
lågenanvihtta+v2+Num+Use/-Spell:vidá GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-OBL ; !old
lågenanguhtta+v2+Num+Use/-Spell:gudá GÅLMMÅLÅGENAN-OBL ; !old
lågenangietjav+v2+Num+Use/-Spell:giehtja GIETJAVLÅGENAN ; !old
lågenangáktsa+v2+Num+Use/-Spell:gákts GÁKTSALÅGENAN ; !old
lågenanaktse+v2+Num+Use/-Spell:akts AKTSELÅGENAN ; !old
